Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB779.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Each district level employee of a local school district who is not assigned one
hundred percent (100%) of the time to a school in the district and who:
(a) Holds a current teaching certificate shall provide substitute teacher services
in a school of the district for at least one (1) full day of every twenty (20) in-
person instructional days in the school calendar; or
(b) Does not hold a current teaching certificate shall provide substitute support
services or substitute teacher services in a school of the district for at least
one (1) full day of every twenty (20) in-person instructional days in the
school calendar.
(2) If the substitute services of a district level employee are not needed during a
twenty (20) day instructional period, that employee shall provide substitute
services for two (2) days during the next twenty (20) in-person instructional days.
(3) The local school district shall prioritize the use of district level employees to cover
daily substitute needs in schools.
(4) District level employees shall not receive additional compensation for providing
substitute services in accordance with this section.
(5) Each local board of education shall adopt policies as needed to implement this
section.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/13/2026 8:37 AM Jacketed